test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-gaajjtsa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - gájjtsa: # N_EVEN (with final a in nom.sg)
    gájjtsa+N+Sg+Nom: gájjtsa
    gájjtsa+N+Sg+Gen: gájtsa
    gájjtsa+N+Sg+Acc: gájtsav
    gájjtsa+N+Sg+Ill: gájjtsaj
    gájjtsa+N+Sg+Ine: gájtsan
    gájjtsa+N+Sg+Ela: [gájtsast, gájtsas]
    gájjtsa+N+Sg+Com: [gájtsajn, gájtsajna]
    gájjtsa+N+Pl+Nom: gájtsa
    gájjtsa+N+Pl+Gen: gájtsaj
    gájjtsa+N+Pl+Acc: gájtsajt
    gájjtsa+N+Pl+Ill: gájtsajda
    gájjtsa+N+Pl+Ine: gájtsajn
    gájjtsa+N+Pl+Ela: [gájtsajst, gájtsajs]
    gájjtsa+N+Pl+Com: [gájtsaj, gájtsajgum]
    gájjtsa+N+Ess: gájjtsan
    gájjtsa+N+Abe: gájtsadak
